Massachusetts, session 194th, S564.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The Wachusett Dam Promenade located in the town of Clinton shall be
designated and known as the Honorable Harold P. Naughton, Jr. Promenade in recognition of the
Honorable Harold Naughton, Jr., Lieutenant Colonel in the Army National Guard and a Veteran
of both the Iraq and Afghanistan Wars. The Honorable Harold Naughton served in the
Massachusetts House of Representatives from 1995 to 2021, before serving as Associate Justice
of the Massachusetts District Court.
SECTION 2. The Massachusetts Department of Conservation and Recreation shall erect
and maintain suitable markers bearing the designation in compliance with the standards of the
department.
of 1